Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5647YH (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2054 Section 1. Section 237A.12, subsection 1, unnumbered 1 paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 Subject to the provisions of chapter 17A , the department 3 shall adopt rules setting minimum standards to provide quality 4 child care in the operation and maintenance of child care 5 centers and registered child development homes, facilities 6 relating to all of the following: 7 Sec. 2. Section 237A.12, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 8 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9 a. (1) The number and qualifications of personnel necessary 10 to assure the health, safety, and welfare of children in the 11 facilities. 12 (2) Rules for facilities which are preschools shall be drawn 13 so that any staff-to-children ratios which relate to the age of 14 the children enrolled preschool staff-to-children ratios shall 15 be based on the age of the majority of the children served by a 16 particular class rather than on the age of the youngest child 17 served. 18 (3) Rules shall require an individual to be at least 19 eighteen years of age to provide child care at a child care 20 facility without supervision. 21 (4) Notwithstanding subparagraph (3), rules shall allow 22 an individual who is at least fifteen years of age to provide 23 child care at a child care facility without supervision if the 24 individual meets the following requirements: 25 (a) The individual has completed department-approved 26 training in safe sleep, first aid, and mandatory child abuse 27 reporting. 28 (b) The individual has at least ten hours of documented 29 experience providing supervised child care at a child care 30 facility. 31